Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.900

Chapter to be construed broadly.

This chapter shall be construed broadly to effect the policy of this state that no person shall be allowed to profit by his or her own wrong, wherever committed.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2087; 1998 c 292 s 503; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.900. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 14.]

NOTES:

Application—Conflict with federal requirements—1998 c 292: See notes following RCW 41.04.273.

Effective dates—1998 c 292: See RCW 11.11.903.